Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5001.
Definitions.

In this chapter, the following words and terms, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning, shall have the following meaning:

“Authority” means the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority created by this chapter.

“Cooperative” means a corporation organized under, or otherwise subject to, chapter 81 of this title.

“Legislative body” means the mayor and board of aldermen of a city, the selectboard of a town, and the trustees or light commissioners of a village.

“Municipality” means any city, town, or village within the State of Vermont, which is authorized to and engaged in the manufacture, distribution, purchase, or sale of electricity in the State of Vermont.

“Person” shall be as defined in section 3001 of this title.

“Project” means any plant, works, system, facilities, and real and personal property of any nature or any interest in any of them, together with all parts of them and appurtenances to them, used or useful in the generation, production, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of electric energy, and together with any capacity or output from them.

“Utility” means any public utility as defined in chapter 83 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.